Hawaii statutes.
§412:2-309 Consent order of removal or
prohibition. Any institution-affiliated party may waive its rights to a
hearing on any notice of charges by stipulating and consenting to the issuance
of a permanent removal or prohibition order or by stipulating and consenting to
the conversion of a temporary suspension order into a permanent removal or
prohibition order. Any permanent removal or prohibition order issued by
consent shall be effective as of the date specified therein and shall remain
effective until modified or terminated by the commissioner. [L 1993, c 350, pt
of §1; am L 1994, c 107, §1; am L 1995, c 52, §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next